Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
Kentucky Agricultural Finance Corporation

247.940.
Legislative findings and purpose.

The General Assembly hereby finds and declares that as a result of a variety of pressures, most notably the continual spiral of inflation and the increasingly serious effects of speculative land values, the opportunities in agriculture have been severely limited; that one of the major impediments to the purchase of agricultural land, machinery and equipment by farmers is their inability to secure adequate financing upon reasonable terms; and, that it is both necessary and desirable to institute policies and programs which will encourage agricultural pursuits from which the Commonwealth derives the numerous social, economic and environmental benefits which historically have proved beneficial to its citizens.

The General Assembly hereby finds and declares further that private enterprise and investment have not been able to produce, without assistance, the capital necessary to permit the small, family farm operators to continue to compete successfully in agricultural enterprises or to permit enterprising individuals to become farmers.

The General Assembly hereby finds and declares further that the purposes of KRS

247.940

to

247.978

are to provide a financing instrumentality more closely allied with the Department of Agriculture in order that the benefits intended hereunder may be more effectively administered to those engaged in agriculture and related enterprises.

The General Assembly hereby finds and declares further that in order to accomplish the purposes herein set forth, the Kentucky Agricultural Finance Corporation shall be and constitute a de jure municipal corporation and political subdivision of the Commonwealth created for the purpose of performing essential public functions and serving the public purposes in improving and promoting the health, welfare and prosperity of the people of the Commonwealth through the stimulation of existing agricultural enterprises and the promotion of new agricultural ventures.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 374, § 1, effective April 11, 1984.

247.942.
Definitions for KRS 247.940 to 247.978.

As used in KRS

247.940

to

247.978

, the following words and terms, unless the context clearly indicates a different meaning, shall have the following respective meanings:

“Agricultural loan” means a loan made by a lending institution to any person for the purpose of financing agricultural diversification, woodland product production, and alternative crop production; land acquisition or improvement; soil conservation; irrigation; construction; renovation or expansion of buildings and facilities; purchase of farm fixtures, livestock, poultry, and fish of any kind; seeds; fertilizers; pesticides; feeds; machinery; equipment; containers or supplies or any other products employed in the production, cultivation, harvesting, storage, marketing, distribution, or export of agricultural products;

“Applicant” means any person engaged in or proposing to be engaged in an agricultural endeavor or an agriculturally related business in Kentucky;

“Board” means the board of directors of the corporation;

“Bond resolution” or “resolution” means the formal document of the corporation authorizing its obligations;

“Bonds” or “notes” means the bonds or bond anticipation notes authorized to be issued by the corporation under KRS

247.940

to

247.978

;

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Agriculture;

“Commonwealth” means the Commonwealth of Kentucky;

“Corporation” means the Kentucky Agricultural Finance Corporation created by KRS

247.944

;

“Governmental agency” means any city, county, or other political subdivision of the Commonwealth and any department, division, or public agency thereof, the federal government or any political subdivision of any other state and any nonprofit corporation or other entity legally empowered to act on behalf of any of the foregoing in the area of assistance to agriculture;

“Issuing agency capacity” means the action of the corporation in authorizing revenue bonds for a qualified project in accordance with the provisions of KRS

103.210

to

103.285

in which the corporation’s liability is limited primarily to fiduciary duties;

“Lending agency capacity” means the action of the corporation in participating directly or indirectly in the making of loans to or the purchasing of loans of qualified applicants;

“Lending institution” means any bank, bank or trust company, or institutions of the farm credit system organized under the Farm Credit Act of 1971, 12

U.S.C. secs. 2001

et seq., as amended, building and loan association, homestead, insurance company, investment banker, mortgage banker or company, pension or retirement fund, savings bank or savings and loan association, small business investment company, credit union, the federal government, or any other financial institution authorized to do business in the Commonwealth of Kentucky or operating under the supervision of any federal agency or any corporation organized or operating pursuant to Section 25 of the Federal Reserve Act;

“Obligations” means any bonds or notes authorized to be issued by the corporation under the provisions of KRS

247.940

to

247.978

;

“Project” means any undertaking to provide for the financing of the acquisition, construction, renovation, or improvement of land, buildings, machinery, equipment, and livestock in the area of agricultural enterprise; including but not limited to agricultural endeavors such as growing, storing, processing, warehousing, marketing, and distribution facilities in respect thereof or to provide for refinancing existing agricultural facilities;

“Trust agreement” means an indenture by and between the corporation and the corporate trustee setting forth the rights and duties of each relating to the authorization, sale, issuance, delivery, and payment of the corporation’s obligations; and

“Umbrella obligation” means bonds or notes issued by the corporation in its issuing agency capacity or its lending agency capacity under the provisions of KRS

247.940

to

247.978

, the proceeds of which may be used in the financing of multiple projects for two (2) or more applicants.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 374, § 2, effective April 11, 1984; 1986, ch. 331, § 42, effective July 15, 1986; 1986, ch. 452, § 2, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 440, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 2004, ch. 41, § 4, effective July 13, 2004.

247.944.
Kentucky Agricultural Finance Corporation — Board of directors — Executive director — Quorum — Expenses.

There is hereby created and established the Kentucky Agricultural Finance Corporation which shall be attached to the Department of Agriculture.

The corporation is created and established as a de jure municipal corporation and political subdivision of the Commonwealth to perform essential governmental and public functions and purposes in improving and otherwise promoting the health and general welfare of the people through the promotion of agriculture through the Commonwealth.

The corporation shall be governed by a board of directors consisting of twelve (12) members, ten (10) of whom shall be appointed by the Commissioner. The other two (2) members shall be the Commissioner, who shall serve as chairperson, and the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet. The Commissioner may designate a representative to serve as chairperson in the Commissioner’s absence.

The Commissioner shall appoint ten (10) private members of the board to take office and to exercise all powers of the board immediately. The ten (10) directors of the corporation shall be appointed using staggered terms and shall be subject to confirmation as provided in KRS 11.160(2). Of the ten (10) private members of the board appointed by the Commissioner, two (2) may be officers from a commercial lending institution, one (1) may be an officer from a farm credit association, one (1) may be an agricultural economist, one (1) shall be a tobacco farmer, one (1) shall be a cash grain farmer, one (1) shall be a livestock farmer, one (1) shall be a dairy or poultry farmer, one (1) shall be a horticultural farmer, and one (1) shall be from the equine industry. To promote efficient use of agricultural resources and coordination among agricultural leaders, the Commissioner shall appoint a member from the Agricultural Development Board, who meets the qualifications for one (1) of the positions set out in this subsection, to one (1) of the ten (10) board positions governing the Kentucky Agricultural Finance Corporation.

Upon the expiration of the initial terms of the private members of the board, the Commissioner shall appoint successors representing the same constituencies as the members succeeded for a term of four (4) years in each case. In the case of a vacancy, the Commissioner may appoint a successor to hold office during the remainder of the term.

Staff services for the board shall be provided by the Department of Agriculture. The executive director of the Agricultural Development Board shall serve as executive director for the Kentucky Agricultural Finance Corporation board.

The executive director shall administer, manage, and direct the affairs and business of the corporation, subject to the policies, control, and direction of the board. The executive director shall keep a record of the proceedings of the corporation and shall be custodian of all books, documents, and papers filed with the corporation, the minute book or journal of the corporation, and its official seal. The executive director shall have authority to cause copies to be made of all minutes and other records and documents of the corporation and to give certificates under the official seal of the corporation to the effect that the copies are true copies, and all persons dealing with the corporation may rely on such certifications.

A majority of the board shall constitute a quorum for the purpose of conducting its business and exercising its powers and for all other purposes, notwithstanding the existence of any vacancies; provided, however, that a majority of the board may elect from among its members an executive committee to act in its stead in the day to day conduct of the business of the corporation. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the full board shall hold at least one (1) meeting each calendar quarter in accordance with a schedule to be established by the board.

Action may be taken by the corporation upon a vote of a majority of the directors present at a meeting at which a quorum exists called upon three (3) days written notice or upon the concurrence of at least seven (7) directors or by the board’s executive committee.

All members of the board shall be entitled to their reasonable and necessary expenses actually incurred in discharging their duties.

The Kentucky Agricultural Finance Corporation shall not be subject to reorganization under KRS Chapter 12.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 374, § 3, effective April 11, 1984; 1990, ch. 440, § 2, effective July 13, 1990; 1996, ch. 208, § 3, effective July 15, 1996; 2004, ch. 41, § 5, effective July 13, 2004; 2021 ch. 12, § 7, effective March 12, 2021.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(3/12/2021). This statute was amended by Section 7 of 2021 Ky. Acts ch. 12. Section 16 of that Act states, in part: “[I]t is imperative that the continuity of the Agricultural Development Board and the Kentucky Agricultural Finance Corporation remain as established upon the effective date of this Act. Therefore, it is the intent of the General Assembly that each member of the Agricultural Development Board and the Kentucky Agricultural Finance Corporation shall serve his or her term as appointed and shall not be replaced unless by resignation and duly recognized.”

247.946.
Powers of corporation.

The corporation shall have all of the powers necessary or convenient to carry out and effectuate the purposes and provisions of KRS

247.940

to

247.978

including, but without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the power:

To adopt bylaws for the regulation of its affairs and the conduct of its business and to prescribe rules, administrative regulations, and policies in connection with the performance of its functions and duties;

To review the projects authorized to be financed by KRS

247.940

to

247.978

in order to determine the following:

The qualifications of the applicant as a party entitled to financing assistance under the provisions of KRS

247.940

to

247.978

and the rules and administrative regulations of the corporation;

The qualifications of the applicant in the areas of experience, training, and financial ability in relation to the project for which assistance is sought and any other areas as the corporation shall determine necessary and desirable in implementing the intent of KRS 247.940 to 247.978 in the promotion of agriculture throughout the Commonwealth. Analysis shall include a careful evaluation of character, experience, record, and prospects for sound financial management and sound operation of the project. Financial ability factors to be considered shall include the applicant’s total assets controlled, equity owned, contingent liabilities, history of earnings to date, and repayment capacity, as well as other factors set by the corporation. Consideration may be given to the special needs of beginning farmers;

The economic need for the project in the area based upon general economic conditions and unemployment in the region;

The economic soundness of the project based upon generally accepted cost-benefit methodology; and

Consistency of the project with other policies of the Commonwealth designed to ensure a sustained land base for agriculture including preservation of prime farmland and promotion of soil conservation techniques for protection of farmland;

To issue from time to time bonds, notes, bond anticipation notes, renewal notes, refunding bonds, interim certificates, certificates of indebtedness, debentures, warrants, commercial paper, or other obligations or evidence of indebtedness, hereinafter collectively referred to as “bonds” or “notes,” to provide funds for and to fulfill and achieve its authorized public functions or corporate purposes, as set forth in the provisions of KRS

247.940

to

247.978

; and in addition to the powers conferred hereunder, to have all the authority delegated to cities and counties pursuant to the provisions of KRS

103.200

to

103.285

; provided, however, that bonds or notes issued by the corporation shall not be subject to the jurisdiction or approval of the Industrial Revenue Bond Oversight Committee or the State Property and Buildings Commission but shall be subject to the review of the Office of Financial Management in the Office of the Controller within the Finance and Administration Cabinet;

To make or participate in the making of insured mortgage loans to qualified applicants for the purpose of purchasing agricultural real estate and improvements;

To purchase or participate in the purchase of mortgage loans made to qualified applicants for the purpose of purchasing agricultural real estate and improvements;

To make or participate in the making of loans to qualified applicants for the purpose of purchasing machinery, equipment, and livestock;

To purchase or participate in the purchase of loans to qualified applicants for the purpose of purchasing machinery, equipment, and livestock;

To make or participate in the making or to purchase or participate in the purchase of loans to qualified applicants for the purpose of leasing equipment, introducing new agricultural commodities or enhancing agricultural markets;

To collect and pay reasonable fees and charges in connection with making, purchasing, and servicing its loans, notes, bonds, commitments, and other evidences of indebtedness;

To acquire real and personal property, or any interest therein, by purchase, foreclosure, lease, sublease, or otherwise; to own, manage, and operate real and personal property; to sell, assign, exchange, transfer, convey, lease, mortgage, or otherwise dispose of or encumber real and personal property where necessary or appropriate to the purposes of the corporation subject to the rights of holders of the bonds of the corporation, at public or private sale, with or without public bidding;

To sell, at public or private sale, all or any part of any real estate mortgage or chattel mortgage or other instrument or document securing any loan permitted by KRS

247.940

to

247.978

;

To procure insurance against any loss in connection with its operations in the amounts and from any insurers, as it may deem necessary or desirable;

To consent, whenever the corporation deems necessary or desirable in the fulfillment of its corporate purposes, to the modification of interest rates, time of payment of principal or interest, or any other terms of any loan, contract, or agreement of any kind to which the corporation is a party;

To include in any borrowing those amounts deemed necessary by the corporation to pay financing charges, capitalized interest, consultant, advisory, and legal fees and any other expenses necessary or incident to any borrowing;

To make and publish administrative regulations respecting its lending programs and any other rules and regulations as are necessary to effectuate its corporate purposes;

To make, execute, and effectuate any and all agreements or other documents with any governmental agency or any person, corporation, association, partnership, or other organization or entity, necessary to accomplish the purposes of KRS

247.940

to

247.978

;

To accept gifts, devises, bequests, grants, loans, appropriations, and other assistance and any other aid from any source whatsoever and to agree to and to comply with conditions attached thereto;

To sue and be sued in its own name and in the name of any subsidiary corporation or entity which may be created pursuant to subsection (28) of this section;

To maintain an office in the city of Frankfort and at any other place or places as it may determine;

To employ fiscal consultants, engineers, attorneys, appraisers, and such other agents and employees as may be required in the judgment of the corporation and to fix and pay their compensation from funds available to the corporation therefor;

To invest any funds held in sinking funds, reserve funds, or trust fund accounts or any moneys not required for immediate disbursement by the corporation in:

Obligations of or guaranteed by the Commonwealth, United States of America or their respective agencies and instrumentalities;

Certificates of deposit and other evidences of deposit at state and federal chartered banks and savings and loan associations, fully collateralized as to any principal amount in excess of the amount insured by the United States government or any agency thereof;

A guaranteed investment or similar contract, which provides for the investment of funds at a guaranteed rate of return, with an insurance company or depository financial institution with a claim paying rating of no less than either of the two (2) highest grades given by a nationally recognized rating agency; and

Any other investment authorized by law for the investment of funds of the Commonwealth;

Subject to the rights of holders of bonds of the corporation, to renegotiate, refinance, or foreclose on any mortgage, security interest, or lien; or commence any action to protect or enforce any right or benefit conferred upon the corporation by any law, mortgage, security interest, lien, contract, or other agreement; and bid for and purchase property at any foreclosure or at any other sale or otherwise acquire or take possession of any property; and in any such event, the corporation may complete, administer, pay the principal of and interest on any obligation incurred in connection with the property, dispose of and otherwise deal with the property in any manner as may be necessary or desirable to protect the interest of the corporation or of holders of its bonds therein;

To insure, coinsure, reinsure, or cause to be insured, coinsured or reinsured, agricultural loans, mortgage loans, or mortgages, or any other type of loans, and pay or receive premiums on insurance, coinsurance, or reinsurance, and establish reserves for losses, and participate in the insurance, coinsurance, or reinsurance of agricultural loans, mortgage loans or mortgages, or any other type of loans with the federal or state government or any private insurance company;

To undertake and carry out or authorize the completion of studies and analyses of agricultural conditions and needs within the Commonwealth and needs relating to the promotion of agricultural exports and ways of meeting the needs, and make the studies and analyses available to the public and to the agricultural industry, and to engage in research or disseminate information on agriculture and agricultural exports;

To accept federal, state, or private financial or technical assistance and comply with any conditions for assistance, provided that those conditions are not in conflict with the intent of the provisions of KRS

247.940

to

247.978

;

To purchase, discount, sell, negotiate and guarantee, insure, co-insure and reinsure notes, drafts, checks, bills of exchange, acceptances, bankers’ acceptances, cable transfers, letters of credit, and other evidence of indebtedness;

To serve as the beneficiary of any public trust; and

To create such subsidiary corporations or entities as may be necessary to borrow money, insure or reinsure agricultural loans, or issue bonds.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 374, § 4, effective April 11, 1984; 1988, ch. 368, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 440, § 3, effective July 13, 1990; 2000, ch. 46, § 27, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 85, § 664, effective June 20, 2005.

247.9471.
Purchase and sale of agricultural loans by corporation.

The corporation may purchase or contract to purchase and sell or contract to sell agricultural loans made by lending institutions. All lending institutions are hereby authorized to purchase and sell agricultural loans to the corporation in accordance with the provisions of KRS

247.940

to

247.978

and the rules and administrative regulations of the corporation.

The corporation may make, or contract to make, loans to and deposits with lending institutions. All lending institutions are hereby authorized to borrow funds and accept deposits from the corporation in accordance with the provisions of KRS

247.940

to

247.978

and the rules and administrative regulations of the corporation. The corporation shall require that all proceeds of its loans to or deposits with lending institutions, or an equivalent amount, shall be used by the lending institutions to make agricultural loans, subject to the terms and conditions as the corporation may prescribe.

To the extent that any provisions of this section may be inconsistent with any provision of law governing lending institutions, the provisions of this section shall control.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 440, § 4, effective July 13, 1990.

247.9473.
Corporation may insure and reinsure agricultural loans.

The corporation is hereby authorized to insure and reinsure agricultural loans made by lending institutions, subject to the terms, conditions, limitations, collateral and security provisions, and reserve requirements as shall be determined by the corporation in accordance with the rules and administrative regulations adopted by the corporation.

Unless otherwise determined by the corporation, insurance on agricultural loans shall be in the amount of one hundred percent (100%) of the unpaid principal and interest on each loan.

An insured agricultural loan shall be in default when the holder of the loan makes application to the corporation for payment of insurance on the loan stating that the loan is in default in accordance with the terms of any agreement with respect to the insurance executed pursuant to this section.

The corporation may enter into agreements with any person, lending institution, or holder of an insured agricultural loan upon the terms as may be agreed upon between the corporation and any person, lending institution, or holder, to provide for the administration, applications therefor, repayment thereof, and to establish the conditions for payment of insurance by the corporation, and the servicing, suit upon, or foreclosure of insured agricultural loans.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 440, § 5, effective July 13, 1990.

247.948.
Obligations not debt of Commonwealth.

Obligations issued under the provisions of KRS

247.940

to

247.978

shall not be deemed to constitute a debt, liability or obligation of the Commonwealth or any political subdivision thereof or a pledge of the faith and credit of the Commonwealth or any such political subdivision, but shall be payable solely from the revenues or assets of the corporation. Each obligation issued under the provisions of KRS

247.940

to

247.978

shall contain on the face thereof a statement to the effect that the corporation shall not be obligated to pay the same nor the interest thereon, except from the revenues or assets pledged therefor, and that neither the faith and credit nor the taxing power of the Commonwealth or any political subdivision thereof is pledged to the payment of the principal of or the interest on such obligations.

Expenses incurred by the corporation in carrying out the provisions of KRS

247.940

to

247.978

may be payable from funds provided pursuant to KRS

247.940

to

247.978

and no liability shall be incurred by the corporation hereunder beyond the extent to which moneys shall have been so provided.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 374, § 5, effective April 11, 1984.

247.950.
Issuance of bonds or notes by corporation.

The corporation is hereby authorized to provide for the issuance in its lending agency capacity and in its issuing agency capacity, at one (1) time or from time to time, of bonds, notes, renewal notes, refunding bonds, interim certificates, certificate of indebtedness, debentures, warrants, commercial paper, or other obligations or evidences of indebtedness, hereinafter collectively referred to as “bonds or notes” of the corporation in an amount not to exceed five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000). The principal of and the interest on these bonds or notes shall be payable solely from the funds herein provided for the payment. Notes may be made payable from the proceeds of the bonds or renewal notes or, in the event bond or renewal note proceeds are not available, the notes may be paid from any available revenues or assets of the corporation.

Bonds or notes of each issue shall be dated and may be redeemable prior to maturity at the option of the corporation under terms and conditions as may be determined by the corporation.

Bonds or notes shall bear interest at such rate or rates as may be determined by the corporation at a publicly advertised competitive sale or, at the discretion of the corporation, upon a private, negotiated basis.

Bonds or notes shall mature as to principal and shall be payable as to interest upon the terms as the corporation shall determine in light of the conditions of the municipal bond market at the time of their authorization; provided, however, that obligations issued to finance personal property shall not have a term in excess of the expected useful life of the property financed.

The corporation shall determine the form and manner of the execution of the bonds or notes, denominations, medium, and places of payment. In the event any officer of the corporation whose signature or a facsimile of whose signature shall appear on any bonds or notes attached thereto shall cease to be an officer before the delivery thereof, the signature or facsimile shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes as if said party had remained in office until delivery.

The proceeds of any bonds or notes shall be used solely for the purposes for which issued and shall be disbursed in a manner and under restrictions as the corporation may determine in its bond resolution authorizing the issuance thereof or in the trust agreement.

Bonds or notes of the corporation may be sold for a price in a manner and from time to time as may be determined by the corporation to be most beneficial, and the corporation may pay all expenses, premiums, fees, or commissions which it may deem necessary or advantageous in connection with the issuance and sale thereof, subject to the provisions of KRS

247.940

to

247.978

.

The bonds or notes may be issued in coupon or in registered form, or both, and provision may be made for the registration of any coupon bonds or notes as to principal alone and also as to both principal and interest, and for the reconversion into coupon bonds or notes of any bonds or notes registered as to both principal and interest, and for the interchange of registered and coupon bonds or notes.

Prior to the preparation of definitive bonds, the corporation may, under like restrictions, issue interim receipts or temporary bonds, with or without coupons, exchangeable for definitive bonds when the bonds shall have been executed and are available for delivery. The corporation may also provide for the replacement of any bonds or notes which shall become mutilated or shall be destroyed or lost.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 374, § 6, effective April 11, 1984; 1990, ch. 440, § 6, effective July 13, 1990.

247.951.
Issuance of refunding bonds.

Subject to the rights of the holders of the bonds of the corporation, the corporation is hereby authorized and empowered to issue from time to time its bonds for the purpose of refunding any bonds of the corporation then outstanding, together with the payment of any redemption premiums thereon and interest accrued or to accrue to the date of redemption of such outstanding bonds. All the refunding bonds of the corporation shall be issued, sold or exchanged, and delivered, shall be secured, and shall be subject to the provisions of KRS

247.940

to

247.978

in the same manner and to the same extent as any other bonds issued by the corporation pursuant to KRS

247.940

to

247.978

, unless otherwise determined by resolution of the corporation. Refunding bonds issued by the corporation as herein provided may be sold or exchanged for outstanding bonds of the corporation and, if sold, the proceeds thereof may be applied, in addition to any other authorized purposes, to the purchase, redemption, or payment of the outstanding bonds.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 440, § 7, effective July 13, 1990.

247.952.
Trust agreement to secure obligation.

In the discretion of the corporation, any obligations issued under the provisions of KRS

247.940

to

247.978

may be secured by a trust agreement by and between the corporation and a corporate trustee, which may be any trust company or bank having powers of a trust company within or without the Commonwealth. Such trust agreement or the resolution providing for the issuance of such obligations may pledge or assign all or any part of the revenues or assets of the corporation, including, without limitation, mortgage loans, mortgage loan commitments, contracts, agreements and other security or investment obligations, the fees or charges made or received by the corporation, the moneys received in payment of loans and interest thereon, and any other moneys received or to be received by the corporation. Such trust agreement or resolution may contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the holders of any such obligations as may be reasonable and proper and not in violation of law, including covenants setting forth the duties of the corporation in relation to the purposes to which the obligation proceeds may be applied, the disposition of the pledging of the revenues or assets of the corporation, the terms and conditions for the issuance of additional obligations, and the custody, safeguarding and application of all moneys. It shall be lawful for any corporate trustee which may act as depository of the proceeds of obligations, revenues or other money hereunder to furnish such indemnifying bonds or to pledge such securities as may be required by the corporation. Any such trust agreement or resolution may set forth the rights and remedies of the holders of the obligations of the corporation and of the trustee, and may restrict the individual right of action by any such holders. In addition to the foregoing, any such trust agreement or resolution may contain such other provisions as the corporation may deem reasonable and proper for the security and source of payment of its obligations. All expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of such trust agreement or resolution may be paid from the revenues or assets pledged or assigned to the payment of the principal of and the interest on the obligations or from any other funds available to the corporation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 374, § 7, effective April 11, 1984.

247.953.
Commonwealth prohibited from altering the right of corporation to fulfill agreements with its bondholders.

In consideration of the acceptance of and payment for the bonds of the corporation by the holders thereof, the Commonwealth does hereby pledge to and agree with the holders of any bonds of the corporation issued pursuant to the provisions of KRS

247.940

to

247.978

, that the Commonwealth will not impair, limit, or alter the rights hereby vested in the corporation to fulfill the terms of any agreements made with the holders of the bonds of the corporation, or in any way impair the rights or remedies of the holders thereof, until the bonds, together with the interest thereon, with interest on any unpaid installments of interest, and all costs and expenses in connection with any action or proceedings by or on behalf of the holders, are fully met and discharged. The corporation is authorized to include this pledge and agreement of the Commonwealth in any agreement with the holders of bonds of the corporation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 440, § 8, effective July 13, 1990.

247.954.
Pledge of assets or revenues of corporation binding.

The pledge of any assets or revenues of the corporation to the payment of the principal of or the interest on any obligations of the corporation issued in its lending agency capacity shall be valid and binding from the time such pledge is made, and any such assets or revenues shall immediately be subject to the lien of such pledge without any physical delivery thereof or further act; and the lien of any such pledge shall be valid and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract or otherwise, against the corporation, regardless of whether such parties have notice thereof. Nothing herein contained shall be construed to prohibit the corporation from selling any assets subject to any such pledge except to the extent that any such sale may be restricted by the terms of the trust agreement or resolution authorizing the issuance of such obligations.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 374, § 8, effective April 11, 1984.

247.955.
Moneys received under KRS 247.940 to 247.978 deemed to be trust funds.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, all moneys received pursuant to the authority of the provisions of KRS

247.940

to

247.978

shall be deemed to be trust funds to be held and applied solely as provided in the provisions of KRS

247.940

to

247.978

. The resolution authorizing any obligations or the trust agreement securing the same may provide that any of the moneys may be temporarily invested pending the disbursement thereof and shall provide that any officer with whom, or any bank or trust company with which, the moneys shall be deposited shall act as trustee of these moneys and shall hold and apply the same for the purposes hereof, subject to administrative regulations promulgated pursuant to the provisions to KRS 247.940 to 247.978, and as any resolution or trust agreement may provide. Any moneys of the corporation may be invested as provided in KRS

247.946

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 440, § 9, effective July 13, 1990.

247.956.
Enforcement of rights under trust agreement.

The holder of obligations of the corporation issued in its lending agency capacity pursuant to the provisions of KRS

247.940

to

247.978

and the trustee under any trust agreement or resolution authorizing the issuance of such obligations, except the rights herein given may be restricted by such trust agreement or resolution, may, by suit, action, mandamus or other proceedings, protect and enforce any and all rights under the laws of the Commonwealth or granted hereunder or under such trust agreement or resolution, or under any other contract executed by the corporation pursuant to KRS

247.940

to

247.978

, and may enforce and compel the performance of all duties required by KRS 247.940 to 247.978 or by such trust agreement or resolution to be performed by the corporation or any officer thereof.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 374, § 9, effective April 11, 1984.

247.957.
Corporate system of accounts — Audit.

Subject to the provisions of any contract with the holders of its bonds, the corporation shall establish a system of accounts.

The corporation may cause an independent audit of its books and accounts to be prepared annually and the cost thereof may be paid from any available moneys of the corporation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 440, § 10, effective July 13, 1990.

247.958.
Obligations are negotiable instruments.

Notwithstanding any of the foregoing provisions of KRS

247.940

to

247.978

or any recitals in any obligations issued pursuant to the authority granted hereunder, all such obligations shall be and are hereby made negotiable instruments under the laws of this state, subject only to any applicable provisions for registration as set forth in the trust agreement or resolution.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 374, § 10, effective April 11, 1984.

247.959.
Corporation to receive requested services from Commonwealth officers and agencies — Liberal construction of statutes.

All Commonwealth officers and agencies are authorized to render services to the corporation within their respective functions as may be requested by the corporation.

Construction of KRS

247.940

to

247.978

, being necessary for the welfare of the Commonwealth and its residents, shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes thereof.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 440, § 11, effective July 13, 1990.

247.960.
Obligations are legal investments for public entities and fiduciaries.

Obligations issued by the corporation in its lending agency capacity under the provisions of KRS

247.940

to

247.978

are hereby made securities in which all public officers and public bodies of the Commonwealth and its political subdivisions, all insurance companies, trust companies, banking associations, investment companies, executors, administrators, trustees and other fiduciaries may properly and legally invest funds, including capital in their control or belonging to them. Such obligations are hereby made securities which may properly and legally be deposited with and received by any state or municipal officer or any agency or political subdivision of the Commonwealth for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds, notes or obligations of the Commonwealth is now or may hereafter be authorized by law.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 374, § 11, effective April 11, 1984.